lib/dict/pl_PL.aff
SFX I   iæ        i         [^¶z]ciæ
SFX I   æ         my        [^¶z]ciæ
SFX I   æ         cie       [^¶z]ciæ
SFX I   iæ        ±         [^¶z]ciæ
SFX I   iæ        zê        zciæ
SFX I   æ         sz        zciæ
SFX I   æ         0         zciæ
SFX I   æ         my        zciæ
SFX I   æ         cie       zciæ
SFX I   iæ        z±        zciæ
SFX I   iæ        zê        siæ
SFX I   æ         sz        siæ
SFX I   æ         0         siæ
SFX I   æ         my        siæ
SFX I   æ         cie       siæ
SFX I   iæ        z±        siæ
SFX I   ¶ciæ      szczê     ¶ciæ
SFX I   æ         sz        ¶ciæ
SFX I   æ         0         ¶ciæ
SFX I   æ         cie       ¶ciæ
SFX I   æ         my        ¶ciæ
SFX I   ¶ciæ      szcz±     ¶ciæ
SFX I   ¶æ        dnê       [pr]a¶æ
SFX I   ¶æ        dniesz    [pr]a¶æ
SFX I   ¶æ        dnie      [pr]a¶æ
SFX I   ¶æ        dniemy    [pr]a¶æ
SFX I   ¶æ        dniecie   [pr]a¶æ
SFX I   ¶æ        dn±       [pr]a¶æ
SFX I   ¶æ        dê        ³a¶æ
SFX I   ¶æ        dziesz    ³a¶æ
SFX I   ¶æ        dzie      ³a¶æ
SFX I   ¶æ        dziemy    ³a¶æ
SFX I   ¶æ        dziecie   ³a¶æ
SFX I   ¶æ        d±        ³a¶æ
SFX I   ¶æ        dê        i±¶æ
SFX I   ¶æ        dziesz    i±¶æ
SFX I   ¶æ        dzie      i±¶æ
SFX I   ¶æ        dziemy    i±¶æ
SFX I   ¶æ        dziecie   i±¶æ
SFX I   ¶æ        d±        i±¶æ
SFX I   ±¶æ       êdê       z±¶æ
SFX I   ±¶æ       êdziesz   z±¶æ
SFX I   ±¶æ       êdzie     z±¶æ
SFX I   ±¶æ       êdziemy   z±¶æ
SFX I   ±¶æ       êdziecie  z±¶æ
SFX I   ±¶æ       êd±       z±¶æ
SFX I   ¶æ        dê        j¶æ
SFX I   ¶æ        dziesz    j¶æ
SFX I   ¶æ        dzie      j¶æ
SFX I   ¶æ        dziemy    j¶æ
SFX I   ¶æ        dziecie   j¶æ
SFX I   ¶æ        d±        j¶æ
SFX I   e¶æ       odê       wie¶æ
SFX I   e¶æ       edziesz   wie¶æ
SFX I   e¶æ       edzie     wie¶æ
SFX I   e¶æ       edziemy   wie¶æ
SFX I   e¶æ       edziecie  wie¶æ
SFX I   e¶æ       od±       wie¶æ
SFX I   e¶æ       otê       le¶æ
SFX I   e¶æ       eciesz    le¶æ
SFX I   e¶æ       ecie      le¶æ
SFX I   e¶æ       eciemy    le¶æ
SFX I   e¶æ       eciecie   le¶æ
SFX I   e¶æ       ot±       le¶æ
SFX I   e¶æ       otê       mie¶æ
SFX I   e¶æ       eciesz    mie¶æ
SFX I   e¶æ       ecie      mie¶æ
SFX I   e¶æ       eciemy    mie¶æ
SFX I   e¶æ       eciecie   mie¶æ
SFX I   e¶æ       ot±       mie¶æ
SFX I   e¶æ       otê       gnie¶æ
SFX I   e¶æ       eciesz    gnie¶æ
SFX I   e¶æ       ecie      gnie¶æ
SFX I   e¶æ       eciemy    gnie¶æ
SFX I   e¶æ       eciecie   gnie¶æ
SFX I   e¶æ       ot±       gnie¶æ
SFX I   ó¶æ       osnê      ró¶æ
SFX I   ó¶æ       o¶niesz   ró¶æ
SFX I   ó¶æ       o¶nie     ró¶æ
SFX I   ó¶æ       o¶niemy   ró¶æ
SFX I   ó¶æ       o¶niecie  ró¶æ
SFX I   ó¶æ       osn±      ró¶æ
SFX I   ¶æ        m         je¶æ
SFX I   ¶æ        sz        je¶æ
SFX I   ¶æ        0         je¶æ
SFX I   ¶æ        my        je¶æ
SFX I   ¶æ        cie       je¶æ
SFX I   ¶æ        dz±       je¶æ
SFX I   e¶æ       osê       [^g]nie¶æ
SFX I   e¶æ       esiesz    [^g]nie¶æ
SFX I   e¶æ       esie      [^g]nie¶æ
SFX I   e¶æ       esiemy    [^g]nie¶æ
SFX I   e¶æ       esiecie   [^g]nie¶æ
SFX I   e¶æ       os±       [^g]nie¶æ
SFX I   yæ        ê         [^bmrtw]yæ
SFX I   æ         sz        [^bmrtw]yæ
SFX I   æ         0         [^bmrtw]yæ
SFX I   æ         my        [^bmrtw]yæ
SFX I   æ         cie       [^bmrtw]yæ
SFX I   yæ        ±         [^bmrtw]yæ
SFX I   æ         jê        [mrtw]yæ
SFX I   æ         jesz      [mrtw]yæ
SFX I   æ         je        [mrtw]yæ
SFX I   æ         jemy      [mrtw]yæ
SFX I   æ         jecie     [mrtw]yæ
SFX I   æ         j±        [mrtw]yæ
SFX I   byæ       bêdê      byæ
SFX I   byæ       bêdziesz  byæ
SFX I   byæ       bêdzie    byæ
SFX I   byæ       bêdziemy  byæ
SFX I   byæ       bêdziecie byæ
SFX I   byæ       bêd±      byæ
SFX I   le¼æ      jdê       le¼æ
SFX I   le¼æ      jdziesz   le¼æ
SFX I   le¼æ      jdzie     le¼æ
SFX I   le¼æ      jdziemy   le¼æ
SFX I   le¼æ      jdziecie  le¼æ
SFX I   le¼æ      jd±       le¼æ
SFX I   ±¼æ       êznê      ±¼æ
SFX I   ±¼æ       ê¼niesz   ±¼æ
SFX I   ±¼æ       ê¼nie     ±¼æ
SFX I   ±¼æ       ê¼niemy   ±¼æ
SFX I   ±¼æ       ê¼niecie  ±¼æ
SFX I   ±¼æ       êzn±      ±¼æ
SFX I   eæ        ê         [er]¿eæ
SFX I   eæ        ysz       [er]¿eæ
SFX I   eæ        y         [er]¿eæ
SFX I   eæ        ymy       [er]¿eæ
SFX I   eæ        ycie      [er]¿eæ
SFX I   eæ        ±         [er]¿eæ
SFX I   eæ        ejê       [^er]¿eæ
SFX I   eæ        ejesz     [^er]¿eæ
SFX I   eæ        eje       [^er]¿eæ
SFX I   eæ        ejemy     [^er]¿eæ
SFX I   eæ        ejecie    [^er]¿eæ
SFX I   eæ        ej±       [^er]¿eæ
